Missouri, session 2026, SB1031.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.2030, to read as
follows:
1.2030. 1. No funds shall be expended by any state
department for intradepartmental programs, staffing, or
other initiatives associated with "diversity, equity, and
inclusion" or "diversity, inclusion, and belonging" or any
other initiative that promotes the preferential treatment of
any individual or group of individuals based on race, color,
religion, sex, gender, sexual orientation, ethnicity,
national origin, or ancestry and:
(1) The concept that disparities between groups are
solely the result of oppression;
(2) Collective guilt ideologies;
(3) Intersectional or divisive identity activism; or
(4) The limiting of freedom of conscience, thought, or
speech.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall not prohibit state departments from any of the
following:

SB 1031 2
(1) Following federal and state employment and
antidiscrimination laws; or
(2) Complying with the Americans with Disabilities
Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq.
3. No state department shall mandate, require, or
incentivize private sector employers to implement programs
or initiatives described in subsection 1 of this section as
a condition of awarding a state contract.
✓